Maine, session 132, LD1677.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§47-J is enacted to read:
47-J.
Human Services: Healthy Brain Initiative Council Not Authorized 22 MRSA
Public Health §1700-H
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA c. 279 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 279
ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS PREVENTION AND
SUPPORT PROGRAM
§1700-F. Definitions
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following
terms have the following meanings.
1. Council. "Council" means the Healthy Brain Initiative Council established in
section 1700-H.
2. Plan. "Plan" means the Alzheimer's disease and related dementias prevention and
support plan described in section 1700-I.
3. Program. "Program" means the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias
Prevention and Support Program established in section 1700-G.
§1700-G. Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Prevention and Support
Program
The Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Prevention and Support Program is
established in the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention within the department.
Page 1 - 132LR1067(05)

The department shall implement the requirements of this chapter within existing budgeted
resources. The department shall develop its budget for the requirements of this chapter to
include state matching funds for federal funds, regardless of whether federal funding is
received. The department may seek and receive private grant funds to support the
requirements of this chapter.
1. Administration. The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention shall
administer the program in consultation with the office of aging and disability services
within the department.
2. Program objectives. The program shall engage in activities to support the
following objectives:
A. Educating and informing the public about Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias using evidence-based public health research and data;
B. Supporting early detection and diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias;
C. Reducing the risk of potentially avoidable hospitalizations for individuals with
Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
D. Reducing the risk of cognitive decline in individuals with Alzheimer's disease or
related dementias; and
E. Supporting care planning and management for individuals with Alzheimer's disease
or related dementias.
§1700-H. Healthy Brain Initiative Council
The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention within the department shall
establish and convene the Healthy Brain Initiative Council to examine the needs of
individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias, the services available in
the State for those individuals and the ability of health care providers and facilities to meet
those individuals' current and future needs.
1. Membership. The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention shall invite
individuals representing the following entities and constituencies to participate as members
of the council:
A. Families affected by Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
B. Providers of long-term services and supports, which may include, but are not limited
to, providers from nursing facilities, providers from assisted living facilities and
providers offering home and community-based services;
C. Physicians with experience diagnosing and treating Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias;
D. Primary care physicians and other primary care providers;
E. Nationwide organizations advocating for older adults or individuals living with
Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
F. Area agencies on aging;
G. Institutions with experience in biomedical research related to Alzheimer's disease
or related dementias;
Page 2 - 132LR1067(05)

H. The long-term care ombudsman program established pursuant to section 5106,
subsection 11-C;
I. The office of aging and disability services within the department; and
J. Any other appropriate state agency.
2. Meetings. The council shall meet no fewer than 4 times per calendar year.
3. Duties. The council shall:
A. Examine:
(1) The needs of individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
(2) The services currently available in the State for individuals under subparagraph
(1) and their family caregivers; and
(3) The current ability of health care providers and facilities to meet the present
and future needs of individuals under subparagraph (1);
B. Consider and make findings and recommendations on:
(1) Trends in the populations and service needs of individuals in the State living
with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
(2) The existing resources and services for the diagnosis and care of individuals
living with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias in this State, including the
State's capacity to offer these resources and services; and
(3) Policies and strategies designed to address:
(a) Increasing public awareness of Alzheimer's disease and related dementias
and promoting brain health and risk reduction strategies;
(b) Educating health care providers to increase early detection and diagnosis
of Alzheimer's disease and related dementias;
(c) Improving access to and quality of care for individuals living with
Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
(d) Assisting unpaid caregivers for individuals living with Alzheimer's disease
or related dementias;
(e) Increasing and improving research on Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias;
(f) Improving the collection of data and information related to, and the public
health burdens of, Alzheimer's disease and related dementias;
(g) Improving strategies to address the safety-related needs of individuals
living with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias;
(h) Improving legal protections for individuals living with Alzheimer's disease
or related dementias; and
(i) Improving the ways in which the State evaluates and adopts policies to
assist individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias and their
families; and
Page 3 - 132LR1067(05)

C. Collaborate with the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention to develop
the plan described in section 1700-I.
4. Funding. The council may accept grant funding and other funding as may be
available from the Federal Government; any department, office or political subdivision of
the State; or any individual, foundation or corporation to be used for the purpose of
performing the council's duties pursuant to this section.
§1700-I. Alzheimer's disease and related dementias prevention and support plan
The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention within the department and the
Healthy Brain Initiative Council shall create the Alzheimer's disease and related dementias
prevention and support plan. The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention shall
submit the plan to the Governor and the Legislature by December 3, 2025.
1. Contents of plan. The plan must contain the findings and recommendations of the
council pursuant to section 1700-H, subsection 3. The plan must be developed with
significant input from the nongovernmental members of the council. The plan must include
recommendations of which state agencies should be involved in implementing the plan.
2. Implementation progress reports. Beginning January 30, 2027, and annually on
January 30th each year thereafter, the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention
shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report on the status of the
implementation of the plan. The report must be made available to the public.
3. Update plan every 5 years. Every 5 years, beginning 5 years from the date the
first plan is submitted, the council shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature an
updated plan.
Sec. 3. Alzheimer's disease or related dementias prevention and support
plan. A plan that is in effect on the effective date of this Act that was developed by the
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention within the Department of Health and
Human Services, in consultation with stakeholders, to address Alzheimer's disease or
related dementias prevention and support, is deemed to fulfill the requirement to create a
plan by December 3, 2025 under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 1700-I.
Pursuant to Title 22, section 1700-I, the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention
shall submit the plan to the Governor and the Legislature by December 3, 2025.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Healthy Brain Initiative Council N538
Initiative: Provides allocations to establish a fund and allow expenditures.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 4 - 132LR1067(05)